Illinois, session 104th, SB3836.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Railway Safety Act of 2026. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Rail transportation presents unique safety risks 8    to the public, rail employees, and communities.9        (2) The presence of a qualified locomotive engineer is 10    essential for the safe operation of trains during 11    safety-related events.12        (3) This Act is intended to protect public safety 13    while remaining consistent with applicable federal law. 14    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:15    "Class I carrier", "class II carrier", and "class III 16carrier" have the meanings given to those terms in 49 CFR 171201(1-1).18    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.19    "Defects" include hot wheel bearings, hot wheels, 20defective bearings that are detected through acoustics, 21dragging equipment, excessive height or weight, shifted loads, 22low hoses, rail temperature, and wheel condition.  SB3836- 2 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    "Department" means the Department of Transportation.2    "Intercity or commuter passenger service" does not include 3tourist, scenic, historic, or excursion operations.4    "Line" means a line of railroad.5    "Locomotive cab" means the compartment or space on board a 6locomotive where the control stand is located and which is 7normally occupied by the engineer when the locomotive is 8operated.9    "Locomotive engineer" means an individual proficient on 10the territory the individual operates and certified pursuant 11to applicable federal regulations, including 49 CFR 240, to 12operate a locomotive.13    "Main line" means any railroad, as documented in current 14timetables filed by any railroad with the Federal Railroad 15Administration under 49 CFR 217.7, over which 5,000,000 or 16more gross tons of railroad traffic is transported annually or 17used for regularly scheduled intercity or commuter rail 18passenger service, or both.19    "Main track" means a track, other than an auxiliary track, 20extending through yards or between stations, upon which trains 21are operated by timetable or train order or both, or the use of 22which is governed by a signal system.23    "Railroad" means any form of nonhighway ground 24transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 25guideways, including intercity passenger rail and commuter 26passenger service in a metropolitan or suburban area, and   SB3836- 3 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1high-speed ground transportation systems that connect 2metropolitan areas, without regard to whether those systems 3use new technologies not associated with traditional 4railroads. "Railroad" does not include rapid transit 5operations in an urban area that are not connected to the 6general railroad system of transportation.7    "Safety issue" means any condition, event, malfunction, or 8circumstance that poses an actual or imminent risk to the safe 9operation of a train, including, but not limited to, 10mechanical failure, signal system irregularities, track 11defects, emergency conditions, and operational anomalies.12    "Train" means one or more locomotives coupled with or 13without cars, requiring an air brake test in accordance with 1449 CFR 232 or 238, except during switching operations or where 15the operation is that of classifying and assembling rail cars 16within a railroad yard for the purpose of making or breaking up 17trains. "Train" also means a single locomotive, multiple 18locomotives coupled together, or one or more locomotives 19coupled with one or more cars. "Train" does not include yard 20movements.21    "Wayside detector system" means an electronic device or a 22series of connected devices that scan passing trains, rolling 23stock, on-track equipment, and their component equipment and 24parts for defects.25    "Yard" means a system of railroad tracks, not including 26main tracks and sidings, used for classifying cars, making-up   SB3836- 4 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1and inspecting trains, or storing cars and equipment. 2    Section 15. Requirement for locomotive engineer during 3safety issues.4    (a) A locomotive engineer shall be present in the 5locomotive cab of every train operating on a line within the 6State and shall be capable of taking control of the operation 7of the train in the event of a safety issue occurring. This 8requirement does not apply to yards.9    (b) The locomotive engineer required under this Section 10shall:11        (1) hold a valid and current locomotive engineer 12    certification as required by federal regulations;13        (2) be proficient in the operation of trains, as 14    demonstrated by operational experience consistent with 15    federal certification and qualification standards; and16        (3) undergo regular training to develop the skills 17    necessary to demonstrate that the locomotive engineer 18    meets the requirements of this Section, including the 19    requirement to be able to operate a train manually when a 20    safety issue arises.21    (c) A locomotive engineer shall take full control of the 22train, including operating the train fully manual as necessary 23in the judgment of the locomotive engineer, when a safety 24issue occurs in order to mitigate the safety issue and any 25safety risks.   SB3836- 5 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    (d) A train experiencing a safety issue shall not be 2operated without a locomotive engineer as required under this 3Act until the safety issue is resolved or the train is 4otherwise secured in accordance with applicable safety rules.5    (e) No railroad shall penalize or discipline a locomotive 6engineer who takes appropriate action under subsections (c) 7and (d) when a safety issue arises. 8    Section 20. Wayside detector systems.9    (a) The Commission shall work with each railroad company 10that does business in this State to ensure that wayside 11detector systems are installed and are operating along 12railroad tracks on which the railroad operates and to ensure 13that the wayside detector systems meet all of following 14standards:15        (1) The wayside detector system is properly installed, 16    maintained, repaired, and operational and the latest 17    guidelines issued by the United States Department of 18    Transportation, the Federal Railroad Administration, and 19    the Association of American Railroads.20        (2) Any expired, nonworking, or outdated wayside 21    detector system or component part of a wayside detector 22    system is removed and replaced with new parts or an 23    entirely new system that reflects the current best 24    practices and standards of the industry.25        (3) The distance between wayside detector systems is   SB3836- 6 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    appropriate, the natural terrain surrounding the railroad 2    track on which the railroad operates, and the safety of 3    the trains, rolling stock, on-track equipment, its 4    operators, its passengers, and the persons and property in 5    the vicinity of the railroad track so that if defects are 6    detected operators have sufficient time to do the 7    following:8        (A) respond to the alerts projected by the wayside 9    detector system;10        (B) stop the train, rolling stock, or on-track 11    equipment, if necessary; or12        (C) make all necessary repairs or, if repair is 13    impossible at the location, to remove the component parts 14    or equipment that is defective.15    (4) The railroad company has defined, written standards 16and training for its employees pertaining to wayside detector 17system defect alerts, the course of action that employees are 18required to take to respond to an alert, and appropriate 19monitoring and responses by the company if employees fail to 20take the required course of action.21    (b) If a railroad company refuses to work or otherwise 22cooperate with the Commission in good faith in accordance with 23this Section, the Commission and the Department shall 24investigate that railroad company's safety practices and 25standards in accordance with 49 CFR 212. The Commission shall 26determine whether the company appears to be in compliance with   SB3836- 7 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1federal railroad safety laws, as defined in 49 CFR 209.2    (c) If a railroad company does not appear to be in 3compliance with the applicable federal standards based on an 4investigation conducted under subsection (b), not later than 560 days after the conclusion of the investigation, the 6Commission shall make a report to the Federal Railroad 7Administration. The report shall detail the results of the 8investigation and recommend that the Federal Railroad 9Administration take enforcement action in accordance with its 10authority against the railroad company for the safety 11violations discovered through that investigation.12    The Commission and the Department shall send a copy of the 13report to the Governor, the Senate President, the Speaker of 14the House of Representatives, and the minority leaders of both 15the Senate and the House of Representatives. 16    Section 25. Wayside detector system installation distance. 17Any person responsible for the installation of a wayside 18detector system alongside or on a railroad shall ensure that 19each wayside detector system location is the following 20distance from the adjacent wayside detector system location:21        (1) For a class I carrier railroad, not more than 10 22    miles.23        (2) For a class II carrier railroad, not more than 25 24    miles.25        (3) For a class III carrier railroad, not more than 35   SB3836- 8 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    miles. 2    Section 30. Wayside detector system messages. When a 3wayside detector system detects a defect in a passing train, 4rolling stock, on-track equipment, or its component equipment 5and parts, if the message regarding the defect is not 6immediately sent to the operator of that train, rolling stock, 7or on-track equipment, the person that receives the message 8shall immediately notify the operator of the defect. 9    Section 35. Illinois Commerce Commission responsibility. 10The Commission, as part of its work with each railroad 11company, shall ensure that:12        (1) the manner in which wayside detector systems are 13    installed and placed complies with applicable 14    requirements; and15        (2) the manner in which wayside detector system 16    messages are sent and received complies with applicable 17    requirements. 18    Section 40. Wayside detector system placement waiver.19    (a) If the natural terrain or any other reason does not 20allow for the placement of the next adjacent wayside detector 21system location to be within the spacing requirements 22described in Section 25, the next adjacent wayside detector 23system location shall be not more than 5 miles from the maximum   SB3836- 9 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1spacing allowed under Section 25.2    (b) For class II carriers and class III carriers, prior to 3the installation of a wayside detector system outside the 4applicable spacing requirements in paragraphs (2) and (3) of 5Section 25, the carrier shall submit to the Commission a 6written explanation for the deviation. 7    Section 45. Wayside detector system exemption. Any 8railroad track owned or leased by a class II carrier or class 9III carrier that has a speed limit of 10 miles per hour or less 10is exempt from the requirements stated in Sections 25 and 40. 11    Section 50. Main track inspections.12    (a) All main track designated within the State for 13operation at class III carrier speeds or higher under 49 CFR 14213 shall be subject to visual inspection not less than twice 15each week, with at least one calendar day interval between 16inspections by an inspector designated as a qualified person 17under 49 CFR 213.18    (b) Any defect or unsafe condition on a main track within 19the State identified by any inspection, detection, or 20monitoring method shall be corrected, protected, or removed 21from service immediately upon detection, consistent with the 22requirements of 49 CFR 213.23    (c) If a person qualified under 49 CFR 213 making the track 24inspection finds a deviation from the requirements of 49 CFR   SB3836- 10 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1213, that person shall:2        (1) immediately initiate remedial action; and3        (2) have the sole authority to authorize any 4    subsequent movements to facilitate repairs on the track 5    that is out of service. 6    Section 55. Enforcement.7    (a) The Commission, or another State agency designated by 8law, may enforce the provisions of this Act consistent with 9its authority.10    (b) A violation of this Act may subject a railroad carrier 11to civil penalties as permitted under State law. 12    Section 60. Federal preemption. Nothing in this Act shall 13be construed to conflict with or be preempted by federal 14railroad safety laws or regulations. This Act shall be applied 15to the fullest extent permitted by federal law. 16    Section 65. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 17its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not 18affect other provisions or applications that can be given 19effect without the invalid provision or application. 20    Section 70. Policy. It is the public policy of the State to 21enhance public safety by establishing freight train length 22restrictions on any train that is operated within the State on   SB3836- 11 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1any rail carrier's main line, or any other line, that:2        (1) exposes the general public to unnecessary dangers;3        (2) causes or could reasonably cause unnecessary 4    delays to intercity passenger or commuter trains; or5        (3) causes or could reasonably cause disruption of 6    commerce. 7    Section 75. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 8changing Sections 11-1201 and 18c-7402 as follows: 9    (625 ILCS 5/11-1201)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-1201)10    Sec. 11-1201. Obedience to signal indicating approach of 11train or railroad track equipment.12    (a) Whenever any person driving a vehicle approaches a 13railroad grade crossing where the driver is not always 14required to stop, the person must exercise due care and 15caution as the existence of a railroad track across a highway 16is a warning of danger, and under any of the circumstances 17stated in this Section, the driver shall stop within 50 feet 18but not less than 15 feet from the nearest rail of the railroad 19and shall not proceed until the tracks are clear and he or she 20can do so safely. The foregoing requirements shall apply when:21        1. A clearly visible electric or mechanical signal 22    device gives warning of the immediate approach of a 23    railroad train or railroad track equipment;24        2. A crossing gate is lowered or a human flagman gives   SB3836- 12 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    or continues to give a signal of the approach or passage of 2    a railroad train or railroad track equipment;3        3. A railroad train or railroad track equipment 4    approaching a highway crossing emits a warning signal and 5    such railroad train or railroad track equipment, by reason 6    of its speed or nearness to such crossing, is an immediate 7    hazard;8        4. An approaching railroad train or railroad track 9    equipment is plainly visible and is in hazardous proximity 10    to such crossing;11        5. A railroad train or railroad track equipment is 12    approaching so closely that an immediate hazard is 13    created.14    (a-1) Whenever any person driving a commercial motor 15vehicle, as defined in Section 6-500 of this Code, approaches 16a railroad grade crossing where the driver is not always 17required to stop, the person must exercise due care and 18caution as the existence of a railroad track across a highway 19is a warning of danger, and under any of the circumstances 20stated in this Section, the driver shall stop within 50 feet 21but not less than 15 feet from the nearest rail of the railroad 22and shall not proceed until the tracks are clear and he or she 23can do so safely. The foregoing requirements shall apply when:24        1. A clearly visible electric or mechanical signal 25    device gives warning of the immediate approach of a 26    railroad train or railroad track equipment;  SB3836- 13 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1        2. A crossing gate is lowered or a human flagman gives 2    or continues to give a signal of the approach or passage of 3    a railroad train or railroad track equipment;4        3. A railroad train or railroad track equipment 5    approaching a highway crossing emits a warning signal and 6    such railroad train or railroad track equipment, by reason 7    of its speed or nearness to such crossing, is an immediate 8    hazard;9        4. An approaching railroad train or railroad track 10    equipment is plainly visible and is in hazardous proximity 11    to such crossing;12        5. A railroad train or railroad track equipment is 13    approaching so closely that an immediate hazard is 14    created. 15    (a-5) Whenever a person driving a commercial motor 16vehicle, as defined in Section 6-500 of this Code, approaches 17a railroad grade crossing where the driver is not always 18required to stop but must slow down, the person must exercise 19due care and caution as the existence of a railroad track 20across a highway is a warning of danger, and under any of the 21circumstances stated in this Section, the driver shall slow 22down within 50 feet but not less than 15 feet from the nearest 23rail of the railroad and shall not proceed until he or she 24checks that the tracks are clear of an approaching train or 25railroad track equipment.26    (b) No person shall drive any vehicle through, around or   SB3836- 14 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing 2while such gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or 3closed.4    (c) The Department, and local authorities with the 5approval of the Department, are hereby authorized to designate 6particularly dangerous highway grade crossings of railroads 7and to erect stop signs thereat. When such stop signs are 8erected the driver of any vehicle shall stop within 50 feet but 9not less than 15 feet from the nearest rail of such railroad 10and shall proceed only upon exercising due care.11    (d) At any railroad grade crossing provided with railroad 12crossbuck signs, without automatic, electric, or mechanical 13signal devices, crossing gates, or a human flagman giving a 14signal of the approach or passage of a train or railroad track 15equipment, the driver of a vehicle shall in obedience to the 16railroad crossbuck sign, yield the right-of-way and slow down 17to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and shall 18stop, if required for safety, at a clearly marked stopped 19line, or if no stop line, within 50 feet but not less than 15 20feet from the nearest rail of the railroad and shall not 21proceed until he or she can do so safely. If a driver is 22involved in a collision at a railroad crossing or interferes 23with the movement of a train or railroad track equipment after 24driving past the railroad crossbuck sign, the collision or 25interference is prima facie evidence of the driver's failure 26to yield right-of-way.  SB3836- 15 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    (d-1) No person shall, while driving a commercial motor 2vehicle, fail to negotiate a railroad-highway grade railroad 3crossing because of insufficient undercarriage clearance.4    (d-5) (Blank).5    (e) It is unlawful to violate any part of this Section.6        (1) A violation of this Section is a petty offense for 7    which a fine of $500 shall be imposed for a first 8    violation, and a fine of $1,000 shall be imposed for a 9    second or subsequent violation. The court may impose 25 10    hours of community service in place of the $500 fine for 11    the first violation.12        (2) For a second or subsequent violation, the 13    Secretary of State may suspend the driving privileges of 14    the offender for a minimum of 6 months.15        (3) If a driver is involved in a collision at a grade 16    crossing resulting in the injury or fatality of a railway 17    worker, that driver shall have the driver's driving 18    privileges suspended for a period of not less than 6 19    months up to revocation. 20    (f) Corporate authorities of municipal corporations 21regulating operators of vehicles that fail to obey signals 22indicating the presence, approach, passage, or departure of a 23train or railroad track equipment shall impose fines as 24established in subsection (e) of this Section.25(Source: P.A. 103-179, eff. 6-30-23.)   SB3836- 16 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    (625 ILCS 5/18c-7402)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 18c-7402)2    Sec. 18c-7402. Safety requirements for railroad 3operations. 4    (1) Obstruction of crossings.5        (a) Obstruction of emergency vehicles. Every railroad 6    shall be operated in such a manner as to minimize 7    obstruction of emergency vehicles at crossings. Where such 8    obstruction occurs and the train crew is aware of the 9    obstruction, the train crew shall immediately take any 10    action, consistent with safe operating procedure, 11    necessary to remove the obstruction. In the Chicago and 12    St. Louis switching districts, every railroad dispatcher 13    or other person responsible for the movement of railroad 14    equipment in a specific area who receives notification 15    that railroad equipment is obstructing the movement of an 16    emergency vehicle at any crossing within such area shall 17    immediately notify the train crew through use of existing 18    communication facilities. Upon notification, the train 19    crew shall take immediate action in accordance with this 20    paragraph.21        (b) Obstruction of highway at grade crossing 22    prohibited. It is unlawful for a rail carrier to permit 23    any train, railroad car or engine to obstruct public 24    travel at a railroad-highway grade crossing for a period 25    in excess of 10 minutes, except where such train or 26    railroad car is continuously moving or cannot be moved by   SB3836- 17 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    reason of circumstances over which the rail carrier has no 2    reasonable control.3        In a county with a population of greater than 4    1,000,000, as determined by the most recent federal 5    census, during the hours of 7:00 a.m. through 9:00 a.m. 6    and 4:00 p.m. through 6:00 p.m. it is unlawful for a rail 7    carrier to permit any single train or railroad car to 8    obstruct public travel at a railroad-highway grade 9    crossing in excess of a total of 10 minutes during a 30 10    minute period, except where the train or railroad car 11    cannot be moved by reason or circumstances over which the 12    rail carrier has no reasonable control. Under no 13    circumstances will a moving train be stopped for the 14    purposes of issuing a citation related to this Section.15        However, no employee acting under the rules or orders 16    of the rail carrier or its supervisory personnel may be 17    prosecuted for a violation of this subsection (b).18        (c) Punishment for obstruction of grade crossing. Any 19    rail carrier violating paragraph (b) of this subsection 20    shall be guilty of a petty offense and fined not less than 21    $200 nor more than $500 if the duration of the obstruction 22    is in excess of 10 minutes but no longer than 15 minutes. 23    If the duration of the obstruction exceeds 15 minutes the 24    violation shall be a business offense and the following 25    fines shall be imposed: if the duration of the obstruction 26    is in excess of 15 minutes but no longer than 20 minutes,   SB3836- 18 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    the fine shall be $500; if the duration of the obstruction 2    is in excess of 20 minutes but no longer than 25 minutes, 3    the fine shall be $700; if the duration of the obstruction 4    is in excess of 25 minutes, but no longer than 30 minutes, 5    the fine shall be $900; if the duration of the obstruction 6    is in excess of 30 minutes but no longer than 35 minutes, 7    the fine shall be $1,000; if the duration of the 8    obstruction is in excess of 35 minutes, the fine shall be 9    $1,000 plus an additional $500 for each 5 minutes of 10    obstruction in excess of 25 minutes of obstruction.11    (2) Other operational requirements.12        (a) Bell and whistle-crossings. Every rail carrier 13    shall cause a bell, and a whistle or horn to be placed and 14    kept on each locomotive, and shall cause the same to be 15    rung or sounded by the engineer or fireman, at the 16    distance of at least 1,320 feet, from the place where the 17    railroad crosses or intersects any public highway, and 18    shall be kept ringing or sounding until the highway is 19    reached; provided that at crossings where the Commission 20    shall by order direct, only after a hearing has been held 21    to determine the public is reasonably and sufficiently 22    protected, the rail carrier may be excused from giving 23    warning provided by this paragraph.24        (a-5) The requirements of paragraph (a) of this 25    subsection (2) regarding ringing a bell and sounding a 26    whistle or horn do not apply at a railroad crossing that   SB3836- 19 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    has a permanently installed automated audible warning 2    device authorized by the Commission under Section 3    18c-7402.1 that sounds automatically when an approaching 4    train is at least 1,320 feet from the crossing and that 5    keeps sounding until the lead locomotive has crossed the 6    highway. The engineer or fireman may ring the bell or 7    sound the whistle or horn at a railroad crossing that has a 8    permanently installed audible warning device.9        (b) Speed limits. Each rail carrier shall operate its 10    trains in compliance with speed limits set by the 11    Commission. The Commission may set train speed limits only 12    where such limits are necessitated by extraordinary 13    circumstances affecting the public safety, and shall 14    maintain such train speed limits in effect only for such 15    time as the extraordinary circumstances prevail.16        The Commission and the Department of Transportation 17    shall conduct a study of the relation between train speeds 18    and railroad-highway grade crossing safety. The Commission 19    shall report the findings of the study to the General 20    Assembly no later than January 5, 1997.21        (c) Special speed limit; pilot project. The Commission 22    and the Board of the Commuter Rail Division of the 23    Regional Transportation Authority shall conduct a pilot 24    project in the Village of Fox River Grove, the site of the 25    fatal school bus crash at a railroad crossing on October 26    25, 1995, in order to improve railroad crossing safety.   SB3836- 20 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    For this project, the Commission is directed to set the 2    maximum train speed limit for Regional Transportation 3    Authority trains at 50 miles per hour at intersections on 4    that portion of the intrastate rail line located in the 5    Village of Fox River Grove. If the Regional Transportation 6    Authority deliberately fails to comply with this maximum 7    speed limit, then any entity, governmental or otherwise, 8    that provides capital or operational funds to the Regional 9    Transportation Authority shall appropriately reduce or 10    eliminate that funding. The Commission shall report to the 11    Governor and the General Assembly on the results of this 12    pilot project in January 1999, January 2000, and January 13    2001. The Commission shall also submit a final report on 14    the pilot project to the Governor and the General Assembly 15    in January 2001. The provisions of this subsection (c), 16    other than this sentence, are inoperative after February 17    1, 2001.18        (d) Freight train crew size. No rail carrier shall 19    operate or cause to operate a train or light engine used in 20    connection with the movement of freight unless it has an 21    operating crew consisting of at least 2 individuals. The 22    minimum freight train crew size indicated in this 23    subsection (d) shall remain in effect until a federal law 24    or rule encompassing the subject matter has been adopted. 25    The Commission, with respect to freight train crew member 26    size under this subsection (d), has the power to conduct   SB3836- 21 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    evidentiary hearings, make findings, and issue and enforce 2    orders, including sanctions under Section 18c-1704 of this 3    Chapter. As used in this subsection (d), "train or light 4    engine" does not include trains operated by a hostler 5    service or utility employees.6        (e) No railroad operating within this State on any 7    main line or any other line shall operate, or permit to be 8    operated, any train which exceeds 8,500 feet in length. 9    The Commission, with respect to freight train length 10    restrictions under this subsection (e), has the power to 11    conduct evidentiary hearings, make findings, and issue and 12    enforce orders, including sanctions under Section 18c-1704 13    of this Chapter. As used in this subsection (e) "train 14    length" means the measurement of any train operating on a 15    main line or any other line within the State. 16    (3) Report and investigation of rail accidents.17        (a) Reports. Every rail carrier shall report to the 18    Commission, by the speediest means possible, whether 19    telephone, telegraph, or otherwise, every accident 20    involving its equipment, track, or other property which 21    resulted in loss of life to any person. In addition, such 22    carriers shall file a written report with the Commission. 23    Reports submitted under this paragraph shall be strictly 24    confidential, shall be specifically prohibited from 25    disclosure, and shall not be admissible in any 26    administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the   SB3836- 22 -LRB104 17501 LNS 30928 b1    accidents reported.2        (b) Investigations. The Commission may investigate all 3    railroad accidents reported to it or of which it acquires 4    knowledge independent of reports made by rail carriers, 5    and shall have the power, consistent with standards and 6    procedures established under the Federal Railroad Safety 7    Act, as amended, to enter such temporary orders as will 8    minimize the risk of future accidents pending notice, 9    hearing, and final action by the Commission.10(Source: P.A. 101-294, eff. 1-1-20; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.)